Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.060

Constitutional questions—Ballot title—Appeal.

If any persons are dissatisfied with the ballot title for a proposed constitution or constitutional amendment, they may at any time within ten days from the time of the filing of the ballot title and summary, not including Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, appeal to the superior court of Thurston county by petition setting forth the measure, the ballot title objected to, their objections to it, and praying for amendment of the ballot title. The time of the filing of the ballot title, as used in this section for establishing the time for appeal, is the time the ballot title is first filed with the secretary of state.

A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an appeal has been taken must be served upon the secretary of state, the attorney general, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the secretary of the senate. Upon the filing of the petition on appeal, the court shall immediately, or at the time to which a hearing may be adjourned by consent of the appellants, examine the proposed measure, the ballot title filed, and the objections to it and may hear arguments on it, and shall as soon as possible render its decision and certify to and file with the secretary of state a ballot title that it determines will meet the requirements of this chapter. The decision of the superior court is final, and the ballot title so certified will be the established ballot title. The appeal must be heard without cost to either party.

[ 2013 c 11 s 40; 2003 c 111 s 906. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 11. Formerly RCW 29.27.0655.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.